Tennessee, session 114, HB0474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The Tennessee Higher Education Commission, in consultation with the
Department of Labor and Workforce Development, shall study:
(1) Each state-funded financial aid and scholarship program to determine
whether the respective program may be expanded to provide greater financial aid
opportunities for individuals interested in pursuing a workforce credential; and
(2) The number and scope of each financial aid and scholarship program
independently offered by employers or other private entities or organizations in
this state to increase the number of individuals with a workforce credential.
(b) The Commission shall report its findings and any legislative
recommendations to the committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction
over higher education and to the education committee of the senate no later than
January 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0474
000744
- 1 -